Missouri, session 2026, HB3075.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 9, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 9.508, to read as follows:
9.508. March sixth each year is hereby designated as "Kit Bond Day" in
2 Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to participate in appropriate events
3 and activities to honor the life and legacy of Christopher "Kit" Bond, a Missourian who
4 dedicated his life to public service and the betterment of the state of Missouri, serving as
5 the state auditor from 1971 to 1973, the governor from 1973 to 1977 and 1981 to 1985,
6 and as a United States Senator from Missouri from 1987 to 2011.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.